Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-704
Remedies cumulative; applicability of act.

(a) Remedies provided by the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act are cumulative and do not affect the availability of remedies under other law or the recognition of a foreign support order on the basis of comity.

(b) The Uniform Interstate Family Support Act does not:

(1) Provide the exclusive method of establishing or enforcing a support order under the law of this state; or

(2) Grant a tribunal of this state jurisdiction to render judgment or issue an order relating to child custody or visitation in a proceeding under the act.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 45;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 4.

Under this section, a defendant has both common-law and statutory remedies available to contest the validity of an income withholding order issued by another state. Harvey v. Harvey, 6 Neb. App. 524, 575 N.W.2d 167 (1998).